Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,227
Exemption for transportation.

Except as provided in section 81-15,222, the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act does not apply to the transportation, including the storage incident to such transportation, of any substance or chemical subject to the requirements of the act, including the transportation and distribution of natural gas.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 37.